da: Kompatibel lerduestørrelse: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Andet
pt-PT: Tamanho de alvo de argila compatível: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Padrão 108 mm; Outro
cs: Kompatibilní velikost hliněného terče: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standardní 108 mm; Jiné
it: Compatibile bersaglio in argilla taglia: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Altro
nb: Kompatibel leiremålstørrelse: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Annet
th: ขนาดเป้าบินที่เหมาะสม: Battue 108 มม.; Midi 90 มม.; Mini 60 มม.; Rabbit 108 มม.; มาตรฐาน 108 มม.; อื่นๆ
fr: Taille de cible en argile compatible: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Autre
de: Kompatible Tontaubengröße: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rollhase 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tamanho do alvo de argila compatível: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Padrão 108 mm; Outro
zh-TW: 相容的飛靶尺寸: Battue 108 毫米; 中型 90 毫米; 迷你 60 毫米; 兔靶 108 毫米; 標準 108 毫米; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť asfaltového holuba: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Štandardný 108 mm; Iné
pl: Kompatybilny rozmiar rzutka: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standardowe 108 mm; Inne
zh-CN: 适配飞碟靶尺寸: 平飞靶 108 毫米; 中号靶 90 毫米; 小号靶 60 毫米; 兔靶 108 毫米; 标准靶 108 毫米; 其他
ja: 互換性のあるクレーターゲットのサイズ: バチュー 108 mm; ミディ 90 mm; ミニ 60 mm; ラビット 108 mm; スタンダード 108 mm; その他
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost glinene tarče: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Zajec 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Drugo
hu: Kompatibilis agyag célmérete: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinamas molinio taikinio dydis: „Battue“ 108 mm; „Midi“ 90 mm; „Mini“ 60 mm; „Rabbit“ 108 mm; Standartinis 108 mm; Kita
sv: Kompatibel lermålstorlek: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Annat
tr: Uyumlu kil hedef boyutu: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standart 108 mm; Diğer
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος πήλινου στόχου: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Τυπικό 108 mm; Άλλο
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на глинени панички: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Стандартна 108 mm; Друго
fi: Yhteensopiva savikiekon koko: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Vakio 108 mm; Muu
en: Compatible clay target size: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Other
ru: Совместимый размер тарелочек: Бату 108 мм; Миди 90 мм; Мини 60 мм; Заяц 108 мм; Стандартная 108 мм; Другое
es: Tamaño de plato de arcilla compatible: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Estándar 108 mm; Otro
vi: Kích thước mục tiêu đất sét tương thích: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Tiêu chuẩn 108 mm; Khác
ko: 호환 클레이 타깃 크기: 바투 108mm; 미디 90mm; 미니 60mm; 래빗 108mm; 표준 108mm; 기타
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina glinene mete: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standardno 108 mm; Ostalo
nl: Compatibele kleiduif maat: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Rabbit 108 mm; Standaard 108 mm; Overig
ro-RO: Dimensiune țintă de lut compatibilă: Battue 108 mm; Midi 90 mm; Mini 60 mm; Iepure 108 mm; Standard 108 mm; Altele